Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5585.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 102. As used in this act: (a) "Accessory dwelling unit" or "ADU" means a secondary dwelling unit, whether constructed on-site or off-site, that is incidental to another dwelling unit located on the same parcel of real property. (b) (a) "Agricultural land" means substantially undeveloped land devoted to the production of plants and animals useful to humans, including, but not limited to, forage and sod crops, grains, feed crops, field crops, dairy products, poultry and poultry products, livestock, herbs, flowers, seeds, grasses, nursery stock, fruits, vegetables, Christmas trees, and other similar uses and activities. (c) (b) "Airport" means an airport licensed under section 86 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.86. (d) (c) "Airport approach plan" and "airport layout plan" mean a plan, or an amendment to a plan, filed with the zoning commission under section 151 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.151. (e) (d) "Airport manager" means that term as defined in section 2 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.2. (f) (e) "Airport zoning regulations" means airport zoning regulations under the airport zoning act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 23, MCL 259.431 to 259.465, for an airport hazard area that lies in whole or part in the area affected by a zoning ordinance under this act. (g) (f) "Conservation easement" means that term as defined in section 2140 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.2140. (h) (g) "Coordinating zoning committee" means a coordinating zoning committee as described under section 307. (i) (h) "Development rights" means the rights to develop land to the maximum intensity of development authorized by law. (j) (i) "Development rights ordinance" means an ordinance, which may comprise part of a zoning ordinance, adopted under section 507. (k) (j) "Family child care home" and "group child care home" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111, and only apply to the bona fide private residence of the operator of the family or group child care home. (l) (k) "Greenway" means a contiguous or linear open space, including habitats, wildlife corridors, and trails, that links parks, nature reserves, cultural features, or historic sites with each other, for recreation and conservation purposes. (m) (l) "Improvements" means those features and actions associated with a project that are considered necessary by the body or official granting zoning approval to protect natural resources or the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of a local unit of government and future users or inhabitants of the proposed project or project area, including roadways, lighting, utilities, sidewalks, screening, and drainage. Improvements do not include the entire project that is the subject of zoning approval. (n) (m) "Intensity of development" means the height, bulk, area, density, setback, use, and other similar characteristics of development. (o) (n) "Legislative body" means the county board of commissioners of a county, the board of trustees of a township, or the council or other similar elected governing body of a city or village. (p) (o) "Local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village. (q) (p) "Other eligible land" means land that has a common property line with agricultural land from which development rights have been purchased and is not divided from that agricultural land by a state or federal limited access highway. (r) (q) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (s) (r) "Population" means the population according to the most recent federal decennial census or according to a special census conducted under section 7 of the Glenn Steil state revenue sharing act of 1971, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.907, whichever is later. (t) (s) "Qualified residential treatment program" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (u) (t) "Site plan" includes the documents and drawings required by the zoning ordinance to ensure that a proposed land use or activity is in compliance with local ordinances and state and federal statutes. (v) (u) "State licensed residential facility" means a structure constructed for residential purposes that is licensed by the state under the adult foster care facility licensing act, 1979 PA 218, MCL 400.701 to 400.737, or 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, and provides residential services for 6 or fewer individuals under 24-hour supervision or care. (w) (v) "Undeveloped state" means a natural state preserving natural resources, natural features, scenic or wooded conditions, agricultural use, open space, or a similar use or condition. Land in an undeveloped state does not include a golf course but may include a recreational trail, picnic area, children's play area, greenway, or linear park. Land in an undeveloped state may be, but is not required to be, dedicated to the use of the public. (x) (w) "Zoning commission" means a zoning commission as described under section 301. (y) (x) "Zoning jurisdiction" means the area encompassed by the legal boundaries of a city or village or the area encompassed by the legal boundaries of a county or township outside the limits of incorporated cities and villages. The zoning jurisdiction of a county does not include the areas subject to a township zoning ordinance. Sec. 207a. A zoning ordinance must not exclude from any residential zone a mobile home as defined in section 2 of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2302, including, but not limited to, implicit exclusion based on restrictions regarding aesthetics or construction material that are not necessary for public safety or are primarily intended to exclude mobile homes from a residential zone. Sec. 516. (1) If all of the following apply, an accessory dwelling unit is a permitted use of property under a zoning ordinance and is not subject to approval or disapproval under a zoning ordinance, except on a nondiscretionary basis by administrative staff and without a public hearing: (a) The ADU is not greater than either of the following square footage in size, whichever is less: (i) 800 square feet. (ii) 75% of the gross square footage of the dwelling to which the ADU is incidental. (b) The ADU and the dwelling to which the ADU is incidental are set back at least 5 feet from the rear and side property lines. (c) The ADU is located in a district in which residential use is a permitted use, whether or not a residential use other than an ADU is subject to a special land use or conditional use permit. (d) The ADU is constructed as described in 1 of the following: (i) Within what is otherwise a single-family dwelling unit that is existing or under construction. (ii) Attached to or sharing a wall with a single-family dwelling unit that is existing or under construction. (iii) As a separate structure on a parcel with a single-family dwelling unit that is existing or under construction. (2) Subsection (1) does not prohibit a zoning ordinance that is more permissive than described in subsection (1). (3) All of the following apply: (a) In any zoning district with a maximum dwelling unit density, expressed in total number of dwelling units in the district, total number of dwelling units per unit of land area, or otherwise, an ADU must be excluded from the calculation of the dwelling unit density. (b) An accessory dwelling unit is not subject to a parking space requirement or owner occupancy requirement under a zoning ordinance. (c) A local unit of government may retroactively approve an accessory dwelling unit that was built without the approval of the local unit of government. (4) A zoning ordinance must not do either of the following: (a) Impose design, aesthetic, height, or placement requirements on an accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than those applied to the dwelling unit to which the ADU is incidental. (b) Restrict the use of an accessory dwelling unit to occupancy by the owner of the dwelling to which the ADU is incidental. (c) Restrict an accessory dwelling unit from having a basement or require an ADU to have a basement. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 180 days after the date it is enacted into law.